Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska25-2136
Waste; occupant; right to use timber for repairs; limit.

If for the purpose stated in section 25-2135 the occupant employs timber vastly superior to that required for the occasion, he will be deemed to have committed waste, and will be liable accordingly.

R.S.1867, Code § 642, p. 507;

R.S.1913, § 8253;

C.S.1922, § 9206;

C.S.1929, § 20-2138;

R.S.1943, § 25-2136.